Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF306.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 2 TLSB 1391SV (2) 91 ll/ns S.F. 306 Section 1. Section 99G.3, Code 2025, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 9A. âLottoâ means a lottery game connected 3 to a central computer via telecommunications in which a 4 specified group of numbers, symbols, or characters are selected 5 out of a predetermined range. 6 Sec. 2. Section 99G.3, subsection 13, Code 2025, is amended 7 by striking the subsection. 8 Sec. 3. Section 99G.3, subsection 17, Code 2025, is amended 9 to read as follows: 10 17. âSelf-service kioskâ means a machine or other similar 11 electronic device that dispenses only on-line lotto tickets, 12 instant tickets, pull-tab tickets, or other printed lottery 13 products, and that does not provide a visual or audio 14 representation of lottery game play. A âself-service kiosk â 15 is not a monitor vending machine or player-activated gaming 16 machine for purposes of this chapter . 17 Sec. 4. Section 99G.7, subsection 1, paragraph e, Code 2025, 18 is amended by striking the paragraph. 19 Sec. 5. Section 99G.7, subsection 1, paragraph f, Code 2025, 20 is amended to read as follows: 21 f. Report quarterly and annually to the commission , the 22 governor, the auditor of state, and the general assembly a full 23 and complete statement of lottery revenues and expenses for the 24 preceding quarter, and with respect to the annual report, for 25 the preceding year, and transfer proceeds to the general fund 26 within thirty days following the end of the quarter . 27 Sec. 6. Section 99G.7, subsection 4, Code 2025, is amended 28 to read as follows: 29 4. The administrator director or the administratorâs 30 directorâs designee may conduct hearings and administer 31 oaths to persons for the purpose of assuring the security 32 or integrity of lottery operations or to determine the 33 qualifications of or compliance by vendors and retailers. 34 Sec. 7. Section 99G.9, subsection 2, unnumbered paragraph 35 -1- LSB 1391SV (2) 91 ll/ns 1/ 7 S.F. 306 1, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 1 Adopt policies and procedures and promulgate administrative 2 rules pursuant to chapter 17A relating that relate exclusively 3 to the management and operation of the Iowa lottery , but not 4 policies, procedures, or administrative rules that relate to 5 the operation of the department in general . The administrative 6 rules promulgated pursuant to this subsection may include but 7 shall not be limited to the following: 8 Sec. 8. Section 99G.9, subsection 2, paragraph h, Code 2025, 9 is amended to read as follows: 10 h. The means of conducting drawings, provided that drawings 11 shall be open to the public and witnessed by an independent 12 certified public accountant . Equipment used to select winning 13 tickets or shares or participants for prizes shall be examined 14 by an independent certified public accountant prior to and 15 after each drawing. 16 Sec. 9. Section 99G.10, subsection 4, Code 2025, is amended 17 to read as follows: 18 4. A person who has been convicted of a felony or bookmaking 19 or other form of illegal gambling or shall not be employed by 20 the department under this chapter. The director shall have 21 discretion to determine the relevance of a crime involving 22 moral turpitude shall not be employed by other crimes when 23 making decisions regarding employment with the department under 24 this chapter . 25 Sec. 10. Section 99G.31, subsection 3, paragraphs g and h, 26 Code 2025, are amended by striking the paragraphs and inserting 27 in lieu thereof the following: 28 g. A ticket or share issued by the division shall not 29 be purchased by and no prize shall be paid to any of the 30 following: 31 (1) A member of the commission. 32 (2) An officer or employee of the department. 33 (3) An officer or employee of the state providing services 34 to the department to administer this chapter if such officer 35 -2- LSB 1391SV (2) 91 ll/ns 2/ 7 S.F. 306 or employee has access to confidential information which may 1 compromise the integrity of the lottery. 2 (4) A spouse, child, sibling, or parent residing as a member 3 of the same household in the principal place of residence of 4 any person described in subparagraphs (1) through (3). For 5 purposes of this subparagraph, a spouse, child, sibling, or 6 parent of a person described in subparagraphs (1) through (3) 7 is considered to be residing as a member of the same household 8 if the spouse, child, sibling, or parent lived in the principal 9 place of residence for one hundred eighty-three days or more in 10 the immediately preceding three hundred sixty-five days. 11 h. A ticket or share issued by the division shall not 12 be purchased by and no prize shall be paid to any of the 13 following: 14 (1) An officer, employee, agent, or subcontractor of any 15 vendor if such officer, employee, agent, or subcontractor has 16 access to confidential information which may compromise the 17 integrity of the lottery. 18 (2) A spouse, child, sibling, or parent residing as a member 19 of the same household in the principal place of residence of 20 any person described in subparagraph (1). For purposes of this 21 subparagraph, a spouse, child, sibling, or parent of a person 22 described in subparagraph (1) is considered to be residing as 23 a member of the same household if the spouse, child, sibling, 24 or parent lived in the principal place of residence for one 25 hundred eighty-three days or more in the immediately preceding 26 three hundred sixty-five days. 27 Sec. 11. Section 99G.34, Code 2025, is amended by adding the 28 following new subsection: 29 NEW SUBSECTION . 9. Ticket order history; ticket inventory; 30 or any records that if disclosed could impair or adversely 31 impact the security, integrity, or fairness of a lottery game 32 or the security of lottery retailers. 33 Sec. 12. Section 99G.35, subsection 1, unnumbered paragraph 34 1, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 35 -3- LSB 1391SV (2) 91 ll/ns 3/ 7 S.F. 306 The departmentâs lottery security staff under this chapter 1 shall be investigators that support the division may include 2 staff qualified by training and experience in law enforcement 3 to perform their respective duties in support of the activities 4 of the security office to the extent necessary to perform 5 the duties . Lottery security staff Staff that have training 6 and experience in law enforcement shall not have sworn peace 7 officer status. The lottery security office department 8 shall perform security duties including all of the following 9 activities in support of the mission of the department under 10 this chapter : 11 Sec. 13. Section 99G.35, subsection 1, paragraphs c and g, 12 Code 2025, are amended to read as follows: 13 c. Report any suspected violations of this chapter to the 14 one or more of the following, as determined by the department: 15 (1) The appropriate county attorney or the . 16 (2) The attorney general and to any . 17 (3) Any law enforcement agencies agency having jurisdiction 18 over the violation. 19 g. Provide Ensure physical security at the central 20 operations facilities used by the department for purposes of 21 this chapter . 22 Sec. 14. Section 99G.39, subsection 2, Code 2025, is amended 23 to read as follows: 24 2. The director of the department of management shall 25 not include lottery revenues in the directorâs director of 26 the department of managementâs fiscal year revenue estimates 27 for the general fund of the state. This subsection does not 28 apply for purposes of revenue estimates of lottery revenues as 29 described in section 8.22A . 30 Sec. 15. Section 99G.40, subsection 2, Code 2025, is amended 31 to read as follows: 32 2. A lottery fund is created in the office of the treasurer 33 of state and shall exist as the recipient fund for department 34 receipts under this chapter . The fund consists of all revenues 35 -4- LSB 1391SV (2) 91 ll/ns 4/ 7 S.F. 306 received from the sale of lottery tickets or shares and all 1 other moneys lawfully credited or transferred to the fund. 2 The director shall certify before the last day of the month 3 following each quarter that portion of the lottery fund 4 resulting from the previous quarterâs sales to be transferred 5 to the general fund of the state. The director shall certify 6 quarterly that portion of the fund that has been transferred 7 to the general fund of the state under this chapter and shall 8 cause that portion to be transferred to the general fund of the 9 state within forty-five days following the end of the quarter . 10 However, upon the request of the director and subject to the 11 approval by the treasurer of state, an amount sufficient to 12 cover the foreseeable administrative expenses of the lottery 13 for a period of twenty-one days may be retained from the 14 lottery fund. Prior to the quarterly transfer to the general 15 fund of the state, the director may direct that lottery revenue 16 shall be deposited in the lottery fund and in interest-bearing 17 accounts designated by the treasurer of state. Interest or 18 earnings paid on the deposits or investments is considered 19 lottery revenue and shall be transferred to the general fund of 20 the state in the same manner as other lottery revenue. 21 Sec. 16. Section 99G.40, subsection 3, Code 2025, is amended 22 by striking the subsection. 23